coding-challenge/apertium-en-es/apertium-en-es.es-lextor.dix
<pardef n="arabic-roman-tens-ord">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)"/></e>

    <e><p><l>XX</l><r>XX</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>XXX</l><r>XXX</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>XL</l><r>XL</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>L</l><r>L</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>LX</l><r>LX</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>LXX</l><r>LXX</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>LXXX</l><r>LXXX</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    <e><p><l>XC</l><r>XC</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord"/></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="arabic-roman-ord">
    <e><p><l>X</l><r>X</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XI</l><r>XI</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XII</l><r>XII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XIII</l><r>XIII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XIV</l><r>XIV</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XV</l><r>XV</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XVI</l><r>XVI</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XVII</l><r>XVII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XVIII</l><r>XVIII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>XIX</l><r>XIX</r></p></e>

    <e><par n="arabic-roman-tens-ord"/></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="B.C.-a._C.">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>aC</l><r><b/>aC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>a.<b/>C</l><r><b/>a.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>a.C</l><r><b/>a.C</r></p></e>

    

    <e><p><l><b/>dC</l><r><b/>dC</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>d.<b/>C</l><r><b/>d.<b/>C</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>d.C</l><r><b/>d.C</r></p></e>

    

    

    

    

    

    

    <e><p><l><b/>AD</l><r><b/>AD</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>A.D</l><r><b/>A.D</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l><b/>A.<b/>D</l><r><b/>A.<b/>D</r></p></e>

    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e><p><l>siglo<b/></l><r>siglo<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l/><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>siglos<b/></l><r>siglos<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l><b/>y<b/></l><r><b/>y<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l/><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>siglos<b/></l><r>siglos<b/></r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l>-</l><r>-</r></p><par n="arabic-roman-ord"/><p><l/><r/></p><par n="B.C.-a._C."/><p><l><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
